apertium-deu.deu.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzÄÉÖÜßäéöüāēīōūĀĒĪŌŪłŁ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/> 
    <sdef n="p1" 	c="First person"/> 
    <sdef n="p2" 	c="Second person"/> 
    <sdef n="p3" 	c="Third person"/> 
    <sdef n="pers" /> 
    <sdef n="ant" 	c="Antroponym"/> 
    <sdef n="cog" 	c="Cognomen"/> 
    <sdef n="al" 	c="Altres"/> 
    <sdef n="top" 	c="Toponym"/> 
    <sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
    <sdef n="frm" /> 
    <sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/> 
    <sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="dat" 	c="Dative"/> 
    <sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/> 
    <sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral / Number"/> 
    <sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/> 
    <sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/> 
    <sdef n="rel" 	c="Relative"/> 
    <sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/> 
    <sdef n="mfn" 	c="Masculine/feminine/neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="itg" 	c="Interrogative"/> 
    <sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/> 
    <sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/> 
    <sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/> 
    <sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/> 
    <sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/> 
    <sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/> 
    <sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/> 
    <sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular/Plural"/> 
    <sdef n="vblex" 	c="Lexical verb"/> 
    <sdef n="vbser" 	c="The verb 'to be'"/> 
    <sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="The verb 'to have'"/> 
    <sdef n="vaux" 	c="Auxilliary verb"/> 
    <sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle"/> 
    <sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/> 
    <sdef n="pri" 	c="Present indicative"/> 
    <sdef n="prs" 	c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/> 
    <sdef n="pii" /> 
    <sdef n="pis" /> 
    <sdef n="pp" 	c="Participle"/> 
    <sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/> 
    <sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/> 
    <sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
    <sdef n="pst" 	c="Positive"/> 
    <sdef n="st" 	c="Strong inflection"/> 
    <sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="mix" 	c="Mixed inflection"/> 
    <sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine-Feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="sw" 	c="Weak inflection"/> 
    <sdef n="attr" 	c="Attributive"/> 
    <sdef n="pred" 	c="Predicative"/> 
    <sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/> 
    <sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/> 
    <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/> 
    <sdef n="pprep" /> 
    <sdef n="preadv" 	c="Pre-adverb"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/> 
    <sdef n="vbmod" 	c="Modal verb"/> 
    <sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb"/> 
    <sdef n="fs" 	c="Seperable verb in subordinate clause"/> 
    <sdef n="fm" 	c="Seperable verb in main clause"/> 
    <sdef n="atp" 	c="Attachable prefix"/> 
    <sdef n="sent" 	c="End of sentence"/> 
    <sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/> 
    <sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/> 
    <sdef n="guio" 	c="Hyphen"/> 
    <sdef n="lquot" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="rquot" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="percent" 	c="Percentage"/> 
    <sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/> 
    <sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="compound-R" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cmp" 	c=""/> 
    <sdef n="cmp-split" 	c=""/>
    <sdef n="lower" 	c="Lower case"/> 
    <sdef n="irr" 	c="Irregular (for words that differ in inflection and meaning)"/> 
    <sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive"/> 
    <sdef n="nn" 	c="Inanimate"/> 
    <sdef n="erw" 	c="Erweitert (extended)"/> 
    <sdef n="ger" 	c="Gerund (verbal noun, in this case)"/> 
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

<!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

<pardef n="separa">
  <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="quot">
  <e>       <re>[„«]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[“»]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <re>[’'‘]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>–</l>         <r>–<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l>         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="numeros">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+(([.,: ][0-9]+)+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ordinals">
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>.</l><r>.<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- SECTION: Pronouns -->

<pardef n="/ich__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r>ich<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>meiner</l>    <r>ich<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mir</l>       <r>ich<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mich</l>      <r>ich<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="d/u__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>einer</l>     <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>        <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ich</l>       <r>u<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/er__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seiner</l>    <r>er<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ihm</l>       <r>er<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ihn</l>       <r>er<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/sie__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sie<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ihrer</l>     <r>sie<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ihr</l>       <r>sie<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sie</l>       <r>sie<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/es__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>seiner</l>    <r>es<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ihr</l>       <r>es<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>es<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/wir__prn">
  <e>       <p><l>wir</l>       <r>wir<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unser</l>     <r>wir<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uns</l>       <r>wir<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uns</l>       <r>wir<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ich">             <i></i><par n="/ich__prn"/></e>
<e lm="du">              <i>d</i><par n="d/u__prn"/></e>
<e lm="er">              <i></i><par n="/er__prn"/></e>
<e lm="sie">             <i></i><par n="/sie__prn"/></e>
<e lm="es">              <i></i><par n="/es__prn"/></e>
<e lm="wir">             <i></i><par n="/wir__prn"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="quot"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="ordinals"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
